Washington statutes.
RCW 26.16.125

Custody of children.

Henceforth the rights and responsibilities of the parents in the absence of misconduct shall be equal, and one parent shall be as fully entitled to the custody, control and earnings of the children as the other parent, and in case of one parent's death, the other parent shall come into full and complete control of the children and their estate.

[ 2008 c 6 s 640; Code 1881 s 2399; 1879 p 151 s 2; RRS s 6907. Formerly RCW 26.20.020.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.